Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-209
Pawnbroker; limitation on sale of goods.

It shall be unlawful for any pawnbroker to sell any goods purchased or received as described in section 69-201, during the period of four months from the date of purchasing or receiving such goods.

Laws 1899, c. 10, § 9, p. 66;

R.S.1913, § 544;

C.S.1922, § 436;

C.S.1929, § 69-209;

R.S.1943, § 69-209;

Laws 1959, c. 314, § 1, p. 1155;

Laws 1961, c. 333, § 1, p. 1042;

Laws 1961, c. 334, § 1, p. 1043;

Laws 1981, LB 44, § 8.